Washington statutes.
RCW 41.50.255

Payment of legal and medical expenses of retirement systems.

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 5167-S.SL) ***

The director is authorized to pay from the interest earnings of the trust funds of the public employees' retirement system, the teachers' retirement system, the Washington state patrol retirement system, the Washington judicial retirement system, the judges' retirement system, the school employees' retirement system, the public safety employees' retirement system, or the law enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement system lawful obligations of the appropriate system for legal expenses and medical expenses which expenses are primarily incurred for the purpose of protecting the appropriate trust fund or are incurred in compliance with statutes governing such funds.

The term "legal expense" includes, but is not limited to, legal services provided through the legal services revolving fund, fees for expert witnesses, travel expenses, fees for court reporters, cost of transcript preparation, and reproduction of documents.

The term "medical costs" includes, but is not limited to, expenses for the medical examination or reexamination of members or retirees, the costs of preparation of medical reports, and fees charged by medical professionals for attendance at discovery proceedings or hearings.

The director may also pay from the interest earnings of the trust funds specified in this section costs incurred in investigating fraud and collecting overpayments, including expenses incurred to review and investigate cases of possible fraud against the trust funds and collection agency fees and other costs incurred in recovering overpayments. Recovered funds must be returned to the appropriate trust funds.

[ 2004 c 242 s 49; 1998 c 341 s 511; 1995 c 281 s 1; 1993 sp.s. c 24 s 916; 1991 c 35 s 73; 1984 c 184 s 7. Formerly RCW 41.40.083.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2004 c 242: See RCW 41.37.901.

Effective date—1998 c 341: See RCW 41.35.901.

Effective date—1995 c 281: "This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and shall take effect July 1, 1995." [ 1995 c 281 s 2.]

Severability—Effective dates—1993 sp.s. c 24: See notes following RCW 28A.310.020.

Intent—1991 c 35: See note following RCW 41.26.005.

Severability—1984 c 184: See note following RCW 41.50.150.